src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
! Lexicon containing noun stems
LEXICON Nouns
! Nouns ending in vowel
ama+N:amaʼ NOUN_V; ! father
anak% na% lalaki+N:anak% na% lalaki NOUN_V; ! son
anak% na% babae+N:anak% na% babaʼeʼ NOUN_V; ! daughter
asawang% lalaki+N:asawang% lalaki NOUN_V; ! husband
asawang% babae+N:asawang% babaʼeʼ NOUN_V; ! wife
aso+N:aso NOUN_V; ! dog
babae+N:babaʼeʼ NOUN_V; ! woman
baka+N:baka NOUN_V; ! cow
bansa+N:bansa NOUN_V; ! country
banyo+N:banyo NOUN_V; ! bathroom
bata+N:bata NOUN_V; ! child
batang% babae+N:batang% babaʼeʼ NOUN_V; ! girl
batang% lalaki+N:batang% lalaki NOUN_V; ! boy
butiki+N:butiki NOUN_V; ! lizard
eroplano+N:eroplano NOUN_V; ! airplane
guro+N:guro NOUN_V; ! teacher
ina+N:inaʼ NOUN_V; ! mother
isda+N:isdaʼ NOUN_V; ! fish
kama+N:kama NOUN_V; ! bed
kamiseta+N:kamiseta NOUN_V; ! shirt
kompyuter+N:kompyuter NOUN_V; ! computer
kusina+N:kusina NOUN_V; ! kitchen
lalaki+N:lalaki NOUN_V; ! man
linggo+N:linggo NOUN_V; ! week
magsasaka+N:magsasaka NOUN_V; ! farmer
matanda+N:matanda NOUN_V; ! adult
minuto+N:minuto NOUN_V; ! minute
niyebe+N:niyebe NOUN_V; ! snow
nobya+N:nobya NOUN_V; ! girlfriend
nobyo+N:nobyo NOUN_V; ! boyfriend
pangalawa+N:pangalawa NOUN_V; ! second
pera+N:pera NOUN_V; ! money
pusa+N:pusa NOUN_V; ! cat
kape+N:kape NOUN_V; ! coffee
serbesa+N:serbesa NOUN_V; ! beer
supa+N:supa NOUN_V; ! couch/sofa
telepono+N:telepono NOUN_V; ! telephone
tsaa+N:tsaʼaʼ NOUN_V; ! tea
ulo+N:ulo NOUN_V; ! head
yelo+N:yelo NOUN_V; ! ice

! Nouns ending in 'n'
kaibigan+N:kaibigan NOUN_N; ! friend
pagkain+N:pagkain NOUN_N; ! food
pangalan+N:pangalan NOUN_N; ! name
pantalon+N:pantalon NOUN_N; ! pants
taon+N:taon NOUN_N; ! year
telebisyon+N:telebisyon NOUN_N; ! television
ulan+N:ulan NOUN_N; ! rain

! Nouns ending in consonant other than 'n'
doktor+N:doktor NOUN_C; ! doctor
hotel+N:hotel NOUN_C; ! hotel
kambing+N:kambing NOUN_C; ! goat
kapatid+N:kapatid NOUN_C; ! sibling
manok+N:manok NOUN_C; ! chicken
medyas+N:medyas NOUN_C; ! sock
ngayong% araw+N:ngayong% araw NOUN_C; ! today
nars+N:nars NOUN_C; ! nurse
oras+N:oras NOUN_C; ! hour
sapatos+N:sapatos NOUN_C; ! shoe
tubig+N:tubig NOUN_C; ! water
ulap+N:ulap NOUN_C; ! cloud

LEXICON NOUN_V
 @U.Lig.V@+N:@U.Lig.V@  Ligatures ;

LEXICON NOUN_N
 @U.Lig.N@+N:@U.Lig.N@  Ligatures ;

LEXICON NOUN_C
 @U.Lig.C@+N:@U.Lig.C@  Ligatures ;
